nb: Bok choy-variant: Baby-bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai-bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Annet
ro-RO: Soiul de bok choy: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Bok choy Shanghai; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Altele
zh-CN: 白菜品种: 鸡毛菜; 菜心; 白梗小白菜; 奶白菜; 小白菜; 紫衣小白菜; 上海青; 塌棵菜; 迷你小白菜; 其他
it: varietà di bok choy: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Altro
es: Variedad de bok choy: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Bok choy de Shanghai; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Otro
de: Pak-Choi-Sorte: Baby-Pak-Choi; Choi Sum; Joi Choi; Nai Bai; Pak Choi; Purple Lady; Shanghai-Pak-Choi; Tatsoi; Toy Choy; Sonstige
fr: Variété de bok choy: Mini bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak-choï; Purple lady; Bok choy de Shanghai; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Autre
th: ผักกวางตุ้งสายพันธุ์ต่างๆ: เบบี้บ็อกฉ่อย; ฉ่อยซัม; จอยฉ่อย; ไนป่าย; ผักกาดฮ่องเต้; เพอร์เพิลเลดี้; เซี่ยงไฮ้บ็อกฉ่อย; ทัตซอย; ทอยฉ่อย; อื่นๆ
ko: 청경채 품종: 베이비 청경채; 채심; 조이 초이; 나이 바이; 팍초이; 퍼플 레이디; 상하이 청경채; 다채; 토이 초이; 기타
el: Ποικιλία Bok choy: Μίνι μποκ τσόι; Τσόι σαμ; Τζόι τσόι; Νάι μπάι; Πακ τσόι; Μοβ; Μποκ τσόι Σαγκάης; Τατσόι; Τοϊ τσόι; Άλλο
pl: Odmiana bok choy: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choi; Purple lady; Szanghajski bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Inne
hr-HR: Sorta Bok choyja: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Šangajski bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Ostalo
da: Pak choi-sort: Baby-bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai-bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Andet
sv: Pak choi-sort: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Annan
sk-SK: Odroda čínskej kapusty: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choi; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Iné
en: Bok choy variety: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Other
nl: Paksoi soort: Baby paksoi; Choi sam; Joi choi; Nai bai; Paksoi; Purple lady; Shanghai paksoi; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Overige
cs: Odrůda pak choi (bok choy): Baby pak choi; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choi; Purple lady; Šanghajský pak choi; Tatsoi; Toy choi; Jiné
ja: 白菜の種類: ベビーチンゲンサイ; チョイサム; ジョイチョイ; ナイバイ; パクチョイ; パープルレディ; 上海チンゲンサイ; タアサイ; トイチョイ; その他
vi: Loại cải thìa: Cải chíp baby; Cải ngọt; Cải Joi Choi; Cải Nai Bai; Cải chíp; Cải chíp tím (Purple Lady); Cải chíp Thượng Hải; Cải bẹ nhún (Tatsoi); Cải Toy Choy; Khác
lt-LT: Bok choy veislė: Mažieji „Bok choy“; „Choy sum“; „Joi choi“; „Nai bai“; „Pak choy“; „Purple lady“; Šanchajaus „Bok choy“; Tatsoi; „Toy choy“; Kita
pt-PT: Variedade de pak choy: Bok choy bebé; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Bok choy de Xangai; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Outro
hu: Bokchoy fajta: Bébi bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Egyéb
pt-BR: Variedade de bok choy: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Bok choy de Xangai; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Outros
zh-TW: 白菜品種: 小白菜; 菜心; 巨型小白菜; 奶白菜; 青江菜; 紫娘; 上海青; 烏塌菜; 迷你白菜; 其他
bg-BG: Сорт бок чой: Бейби бок чой; Чой сум; Джой чой; Най бай; Пак чой; Лилава дама; Шанхайски бок чой; Татсой; Той чой; Друго
tr: Bok choy çeşidi: Bebek bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choy; Purple lady; Şanghay bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Diğer
ru: Сорт капусты пак-чой: Мини-бок-чой; Чой-сум; Джой-чой; Най-бай; Пак-чой; Пурпурная леди (Purple lady); Шанхайский бок-чой; Татсой; Той-чой; Другое
fi: Paksoilajike: Baby bok choy; Choy sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak choi; Purple lady; Shanghai bok choy; Tatsoi; Toy choy; Muu
sl-SI: Sorta pak čoj: Baby pak čoj; Čoj sum; Joi choi; Nai bai; Pak čoj; Purple lady; Šanghajski pak čoj; Tatsoi; Toy choi; Drugo